District of Columbia statutes.
7-1616

Allocation of funding.

The Department of Health shall distribute capacity building grants to initiative participants in an amount not to exceed the funds available in the Effi Slaughter Barry Initiative Fund, as established by § 7-1617.

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 7, 55 DCR 1282
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5021(c), 57 DCR 181
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(c) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5021(c) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).